Utah statutes.
76-2-407.   Deadly force in defense of persons on real property.
(1)  A person is justified in using force intended or likely to cause death or
serious bodily injury against another in his defense of persons on real
property other than his habitation if:
(a)  he is in lawful possession of the real property;
(b)  he reasonably believes that the force is necessary to prevent or
terminate the other person's trespass onto the real property;
(c)  the trespass is made or attempted by use of force or in a violent and
tumultuous manner; and
(d) (i)  the person reasonably believes that the trespass is attempted or made
for the purpose of committing violence against any person on the real property
and he reasonably believes that the force is necessary to prevent personal
violence; or
(ii)  the person reasonably believes that the trespass is made or attempted
for the purpose of committing a forcible felony as defined in Section 76-2-402
that poses imminent peril of death or serious bodily injury to a person on the
real property and that the force is necessary to prevent the commission of
that forcible felony.
(2)  The person using deadly force in defense of persons on real property
under Subsection (1) is presumed for the purpose of both civil and criminal
cases to have acted reasonably and had a reasonable fear of imminent peril of
death or serious bodily injury if the trespass or attempted trespass is
unlawful and is made or attempted by use of force, or in a violent and
tumultuous manner, or for the purpose of committing a forcible felony.
